fr: Configuration des roues de l’étui de cymbales et batterie: 2 roues; 4 roues pivotantes; Sans roues; Autre
ru: Конфигурация колес кейса для тарелок и барабанов: 2 колеса; 4 колеса (спиннер); Без колес; Другое
zh-CN: 镲片与鼓箱滚轮配置: 双轮; 四轮万向; 无轮; 其他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia kolies puzdra na činely a bubny: 2 kolesá; 4 otočné kolesá; Bez kolies; Iné
es: Configuración de la rueda de la caja de platillos y tambores: 2 ruedas; 4 ruedas giratorias; Sin ruedas; Otro
nl: Bekken- en drumkoffer wielconfiguratie: 2 wielen; 4-wiel spinner; Geen wielen; Overig
el: Διαμόρφωση τροχών θήκης για κύμβαλα και τύμπανα.: 2 τροχοί; 4 περιστρεφόμενοι τροχοί; Χωρίς τροχούς; Άλλο
nb: Cymbal- og trommehjulkonfigurasjon: 2-hjul; 4 hjul (spinner); Uten hjul; Annet
th: รูปแบบและการจัดวางล้อของกระเป๋าใส่ฉาบและกลอง: 2 ล้อ; 4 ล้อหมุนอิสระ; ไม่มีล้อ; อื่นๆ
vi: Cấu hình bánh xe của hộp đựng chũm chọe và trống: 2 bánh; 4 bánh xoay; Không bánh xe; Khác
lt-LT: Lėkščių ir būgnų dėklo ratukų konfigūracija: 2 ratukai; 4 besisukantys ratukai; Be ratukų; Kita
hu: Cintányér- és dobtok kerékkonfigurációja: 2 kerekes; 4 kerekes (spinner); Kerekek nélkül; Egyéb
pl: Konfiguracja kółek futerału na talerze i bębny: 2-kołowe; 4-kołowe obrotowe; Bez kółek; Inna
it: Configurazione della ruota cassa per piatti e tamburi: 2 ruote; 4 ruote girevoli; Senza ruote; Altro
ko: 심벌 및 드럼 케이스 휠 구성: 2륜; 4륜 스피너; 바퀴 없음; 기타
tr: Zil ve davul çantası tekerlek konfigürasyonu: 2 tekerlekli; 4 döner tekerlekli; Tekerleksiz; Diğer
ja: シンバルとドラムケースのホイール構造: 2輪; 4輪スピナー; ホイールなし; その他
ro-RO: Configurația roților carcasei pentru cinele și tobe: 2 roți; 4 roți pivotante; Fără roți; Altele
zh-TW: 鈸與鼓箱輪子配置: 2 輪; 4 輪萬向; 無輪; 其他
de: Radkonfiguration des Becken-/Schlagzeugkoffers: 2 Rollen; 4-Rollen-Spinner; Keine Rollen; Sonstige
fi: Symbaali- ja rumpukotelon pyörärakenne: 2-pyöräinen; 4-pyöräinen, kääntyvät pyörät; Ei pyöriä; Muu
cs: Konfigurace kol pouzdra pro činely a buben: 2 kolečka; 4 otočná kolečka; Bez koleček; Jiné
hr-HR: Konfiguracija kotača za činele i bubnjeve kutija: 2 kotača; 4 rotirajuća kotača; Bez kotača; Ostalo
sv: Cymbal & trumma låda hjulkonfiguration: 2-hjulig; 4 roterbara hjul; Inga hjul; Annat
en: Cymbal & drum case wheel configuration: 2-wheel; 4-wheel spinner; No wheels; Other
da: Hjulkonfiguration til bækken- og trommekasse: 2-hjulet; 4-hjulet spinner; Ingen hjul; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на колелата на кейса за чинели и барабани: 2 колела; 4 въртящи се колела; Без колела; Други
pt-PT: Configuração da roda interna da caixa de pratos e tambores: 2 rodas; 4 rodas (spinner); Sem rodas; Outra
pt-BR: Configuração de rodas do estojo de bateria e címbalos/pratos: 2 rodas; 4 rodas giratórias; Sem rodas; Outros
sl-SI: Konfiguracija koles kovčka za činele in bobne: 2 kolesi; 4 vrtljiva kolesa; Brez koles; Drugo